North Dakota statutes. TITLE 48 Public Buildings
CHAPTER 48-01.1 Public Improvement Contract Bids [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 403, § 28]

48-01.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter 1033, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-01.1-02.
Contracts let to lowest bidder — Emergency waiver. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter 1033, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-01.1-03.
Publication of advertisement for bids. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter 1033, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-01.1-04.
Plans and specifications for public improvement contracts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter 1033, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-01.1-05.
Contents of advertisement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter 1033, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-01.1-06.
Bid requirements for public buildings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter 1033, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-01.1-07.
Opening of bids — Award of contract. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter 1033, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-01.1-08.
Coordination of work under multiple prime bids. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter 1033, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

48-01.1-09.
Use of construction manager. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 1033, § 28.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 28 of chapter 1033, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.